District of Columbia statutes.
8-231.08

Property owner’s concurrent obligations.

The provisions of this subchapter do not reduce, replace, or eliminate:

(1)

The duties and obligations of a property owner to monitor, repair, or maintain the property as required under any applicable District law or regulation; or

(2)

The authority of the Mayor to enforce applicable housing codes or to issue orders in accordance with any applicable District law or regulation.

Mar. 31, 2009, D.C. Law 17-381, § 9, 56 DCR 1596